District of Columbia statutes.
2-594

Director.

(a)

The Open Government Office shall be headed by a Director appointed by the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability to serve a 5-year term.

(b)

The Director may be reappointed and, if not reappointed, the Director shall serve until his successor has been confirmed.

(c)

The Director shall not be removed before expiration of the 5-year term except for cause.

(d)

The Director shall employ staff as needed.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 504
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(a)(2), 59 DCR 1862
D.C. Law 19-124 rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) The Open Government Office shall be headed by a Director appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council to serve a 5-year term.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(a)(2) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).